Hawaii statutes.
§102-4 Advertisement for bids. Public
notice of a call for bids shall be made not less than three different days
statewide, with respect to any state agency, or county-wide within the
particular county with respect to any county or county agency. [L 1959, c 245,
§3; Supp, §7B-3; HRS §102-4; am L 2001, c 303, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next